Montana, session 2025, HB33.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:

Section 1. Section 2-4-315, MCA, is amended to read:
"2-4-315. Petition for adoption, amendment, or repeal of rules. (1) An interested person or, when
the legislature is not in session, a member of the legislature on behalf of an interested person may petition an
agency requesting the promulgation, amendment, or repeal of a rule on an issue that the agency has
jurisdiction to regulate.
(2) An agency may summarily dismiss ANY PORTION OF a petition that raises an issue outside of the
agency's regulatory jurisdiction or rulemaking authority. In this case, an agency is not required to advance THAT
PORTION OF the petition to the agency's petition acceptance procedure or rulemaking proceedings.
(3) Each agency shall determine and prescribe by rule the form for petitions and the procedure for
their submission, consideration, and disposition. Within 60 days after submission of a petition, the agency either
shall deny the petition in writing or shall initiate rulemaking proceedings in accordance with 2-4-302 through 2-
4-305.
(4) A decision to deny a petition or to initiate rulemaking proceedings must be in writing and based
on record evidence. The written decision must include the reasons for the decision AND, IN THE CASE OF A
SUMMARY DISMISSAL UNDER SUBSECTION (2), MUST INCLUDE CONTACT INFORMATION FOR ANY AGENCY OR BODY WITH
POTENTIAL JURISDICTION OR AUTHORITY OVER THE ISSUE RAISED IN THE PETITION. Record evidence must include any
evidence submitted by the petitioner on behalf of the petition and by the agency and interested persons in
response to the petition.
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – HB 33

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 HB0033.2
(5) An agency may, but is not required to, conduct a hearing or oral presentation on the petition in
order to develop a record and record evidence and to allow the petitioner and interested persons to present
their views."

NEW SECTION. Section 2. Effective date. [This act] is effective on passage and approval.
- END -
- 2 - Authorized Print Version – HB 33